Utah statutes.
34-20-4.   Labor relations board -- Employees -- Agencies -- Expenses.
(1)  The board may employ an executive secretary, attorneys, examiners, and
may employ such other employees with regard to existing laws applicable to the
employment and compensation of officers and employees of the state as it may
from time to time find necessary for the proper performance of its duties.
The board may establish or utilize such regional, local, or other agencies,
and utilize such voluntary and uncompensated services, as may from time to
time be needed.  Attorneys employed under this section may, at the direction
of the board, appear for and represent the board in any case in court.
Nothing in this act shall be construed to authorize the board to employ
individuals for the purpose of conciliation or mediation (or for statistical
work) where and if such service may be obtained from the Labor Commission.
(2)  All of the expenses of the board, including the necessary traveling
expenses, incurred by the members or employees of the board under its orders,
shall be allowed and paid on the presentation of itemized vouchers therefor
approved by the board or by any individual it designates for the purpose.
